ro-RO: Varietate de mei: Mei Barnyard; Mei Browntop; Mei Finger; Fonio; Mei Foxtail; Mei Kodo; Mei Little; Mei mixt; Mei perlat; Mei Proso; Sorg; Teff; Altele
fi: Hirssilajike: Japaninhirssi; Teksasinhirssi; Sormihirssi; Fonio; Tähkähirssi; Kodohirssi; Pikkuhirssi; Hirssisekoitus; Helmihirssi; Viljahirssi; Durra; Teff; Muu
da: Hirsevariant: Japansk hirse; Browntop-hirse; Fingerhirse; Fonio; Kolbehirse; Kodohirse; Småhirse; Blandet hirse; Perlehirse; Almindelig hirse; Durra; Teff; Andet
ja: キビの種類: ヒエ; ブラウントップミレット; シコクビエ; フォニオ; アワ; コドミレット; リトルミレット; 雑穀ミックス; トウジンビエ; キビ; ソルガム; テフ; その他
en: Millet variety: Barnyard millet; Browntop millet; Finger millet; Fonio; Foxtail millet; Kodo millet; Little millet; Mixed millets; Pearl millet; Proso millet; Sorghum; Teff; Other
pt-PT: Variedade de painço: Painço japonês; Painço castanho; Eleusina; Fonio; Painço de cauda de raposa; Painço kodo; Painço pequeno; Mistura de painço; Milheto; Painço comum; Sorgo; Teff; Outro
lt-LT: Sorų veislė: Japoninės rietmenės; Rudosios soros; Pirštuotosios soros; Fonio; Italinės šerytės; Kodo soros; Smulkiosios soros; Sorų mišinys; Perlinės soros; Tikrosios soros; Sorgas; Tefas; Kita
hu: Kölesfajta: Japán köles; Barna köles; Ujjas muhar; Fonio; Olasz muhar; Kodo köles; Kis köles; Vegyes köles; Gyöngyköles; Termesztett köles; Cirok; Teff; Egyéb
el: Ποικιλία κεχριού: Κεχρί barnyard; Κεχρί browntop; Κεχρί finger; Φόνιο; Κεχρί foxtail; Κεχρί kodo; Κεχρί little; Ανάμεικτο κεχρί; Μαργαριταρένιο κεχρί; Κεχρί proso; Σόργο; Τεφ; Άλλο
sl-SI: Sorta prosa: Kokošje proso (Barnyard); Browntop proso; Proso prstasti muhvič (Finger); Fonio; Italijansko proso (Foxtail); Kodo proso; Malo proso (Little); Mešano proso; Biserno proso; Navadno proso; Sirek; Tef; Drugo
nl: Gierst variëteit: Japanse gierst; Browntop-gierst; Vingergierst; Fonio; Trosgierst; Kodogierst; Kleine gierst; Gemengde gierst; Parelgierst; Pluimgierst; Sorghum; Teff; Overig
sv: Hirssort: Japansk hirs; Brun hirs; Fingerhirs; Fonio; Kolvhirs; Kodohirs; Liten hirs; Blandad hirs; Pärlhirs; Vipphirs; Durra; Teff; Annan
bg-BG: Сорт просо: Кокоше просо; Просо браунтип; Африканско просо (Дагуса); Фонио; Италианско просо (Чумиза); Просо кодо; Малко просо; Микс от просо; Перлено просо; Обикновено просо; Сорго; Теф; Друго
sk-SK: Odroda prosa: Ježatka obilná; Mohár hnedý; Kalužnica; Fonio; Mohár taliansky; Pšeno kodo; Proso malé; Zmiešané pšeno; Perlové pšeno; Proso; Cirok; Teff; Iné
pt-BR: Painço variedade: Painço-japonês; Painço-verde; Painço-dedo; Fonio; Painço-italiano; Painço-kodo; Painço-pequeno; Mistura de painços; Milheto; Painço-comum; Sorgo; Teff; Outro
de: Hirsesorte: Japanhirse; Braune Hirse; Fingerhirse; Fonio; Kolbenhirse; Kodohirse; Kleine Hirse; Hirsemischung; Perlhirse; Rispenhirse; Sorghum; Teff; Sonstige
ru: Сорт проса: Японское просо (пайза); Просо ветвистое; Пальчатое просо (дагусса); Фонио; Итальянское просо (чумиза); Просо кодо; Просо мелкое; Смесь видов проса; Африканское просо (перистощетинник); Просо обыкновенное; Сорго; Тефф; Другое
zh-CN: 小米品种: 稗子; 褐顶黍; 龙爪稷; 芬尼奥米; 粟米; 雀稗; 细粒黍; 混合黍米; 珍珠粟; 糜子; 高粱; 苔麸; 其他
nb: Hirsevariant: Hønsehirse; Browntop-hirse; Fingerhirse; Fonio; Busthirse; Kodohirse; Småhirse; Blandet hirse; Perlehirse; Romhirse; Durra; Teff; Annet
fr: Variété de millet: Millet japonais; Millet brun; Éleusine; Fonio; Millet des oiseaux; Millet kodo; Petit millet; Millets mixtes; Millet perle; Millet commun; Sorgho; Teff; Autre
tr: Darı çeşidi: Japon darısı; Kahverengi darı; Parmak darı; Fonio; Cin darısı; Kodo darısı; Küçük darı; Karışık darı; İnci darısı; Boz darı; Sorgum; Teff; Diğer
pl: Odmiana prosa: Chwastnica; Proso brązowe; Korakan; Fonio; Włośnica ber; Proso kodo; Proso małe; Mieszanka prosa; Proso perłowe; Proso zwyczajne; Sorgo; Miłka abisyńska; Inne
cs: Odrůda prosa: Ježatka; Proso hnědé; Kalužnice; Fonio; Bér vlašský; Paspalum (Kodo); Proso malé; Směs pros; Dochan; Proso seté; Čirok; Teff; Jiné
it: Varietà di miglio: Echinochloa; Miglio bruno; Eleusine; Fonio; Panico; Miglio kodo; Miglio minore; Miglio misto; Miglio perlato; Miglio comune; Sorgo; Teff; Altro
hr-HR: Sorta prosa: Japansko proso; Browntop proso; Eleusina; Fonio; Sivi muhar; Kodo proso; Malo proso; Miješano proso; Biserasto proso; Obično proso; Sirak; Tef; Ostalo
zh-TW: 小米品種: 稗子; 棕頂黍; 穇子 (手指黍); 福尼奧米; 粟; 鴨爪稗; 細柄黍 (小黍); 混合小米; 珍珠粟; 黍 (稷); 高粱; 苔麩; 其他
vi: Giống kê: Kê lồng vực; Kê browntop; Kê ngón tay; Kê fonio; Kê đuôi cáo; Kê kodo; Kê nhỏ; Kê hỗn hợp; Kê trân châu; Kê proso; Cao lương; Kê teff; Khác
es: Variedad de mijo: Mijo japonés; Mijo browntop; Mijo coracán; Fonio; Mijo cola de zorra; Mijo kodo; Mijo pequeño; Mezcla de mijos; Mijo perla; Mijo proso; Sorgo; Teff; Otro
ko: 기장 품종: 피(돌피); 브라운탑 밀렛; 핑거 밀렛; 포니오; 조; 코도 밀렛; 리틀 밀렛; 혼합 밀렛; 진주조; 기장; 수수; 테프; 기타
th: พันธุ์ข้าวฟ่าง: ข้าวฟ่างบาร์นยาร์ด; ข้าวฟ่างบราวน์ท็อป; ข้าวฟ่างนิ้ว; โฟนิโอ; ข้าวฟ่างหางหมา; ข้าวฟ่างโคโด; ข้าวฟ่างลิตเติล; ข้าวฟ่างผสม; ข้าวฟ่างไข่มุก; ข้าวฟ่างโปรโซ; ข้าวฟ่างซอร์กัม; เทฟฟ์; อื่นๆ